Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1298.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1302.1(a) and (a.3)(1) and (2) and 1302.1-D(a) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 1302.1. Date of Application for Absentee Ballot.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (a.3), applications for absentee ballots shall be received in the office of the county board of elections not earlier than fifty (50) days before the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to its operational needs, any applications for absentee ballots received more than fifty (50) days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. Applications for absentee ballots shall be processed if received not later than five o'clock P.M. of the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of any primary or election.(a.3) (1) The following categories of electors may apply for an absentee ballot under this subsection, if otherwise qualified:(i) An elector whose physical disability or illness prevented the elector from applying for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election.(ii) An elector who, because of the elector's business, duties or occupation, was unable to apply for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election.(iii) An elector who becomes so physically disabled or ill after five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election that the elector is unable to appear at the polling place on the day of the primary or election.(iv) An elector who, because of the conduct of the elector's business, duties or occupation, will necessarily be absent from the elector's municipality of residence on the day of the primary or election, which fact was not and could not reasonably be known to the elector on or before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or 20250HB1298PN1494 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 election.(2) An elector described in paragraph (1) may submit an application for an absentee ballot at any time up until the time of the closing of the polls on the day of the primary or election. The application shall include a declaration describing the circumstances that prevented the elector from applying for an absentee ballot before five o'clock P.M. on the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of the primary or election or that prevent the elector from appearing at the polling place on the day of the primary or election, and the elector's qualifications under paragraph (1). The declaration shall be made subject to the provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).* * *Section 1302.1-D. Date of application for mail-in ballot.(a) General rule.--Applications for mail-in ballots shall be received in the office of the county board of elections not earlier than 50 days before the primary or election, except that if a county board of elections determines that it would be appropriate to the county board of elections' operational needs, any applications for mail-in ballots received more than 50 days before the primary or election may be processed before that time. Applications for mail-in ballots shall be processed if received not later than five o'clock P.M. of the [first Tuesday] fifteenth day prior to the day of any primary or election.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1298PN1494 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627